src-fst-morphology-phonology.twolc.md
**Even syllabic verbs I, cg m:0** - used with  +Imp+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+ConNeg,
oolmaž+N+Sg+Nom: **person/henkilö**
* *o^1VOWlmm^V2VV^YXX2YX>až*
* *oolm000>až*
* *sää0mm^PAL^CC2C*
* *sääʹm000*
kåʹmrded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3 **bow**
* *kååʹmmerd^PenVow2a*
* *kååʹmmard0*
mainstummuš+N+Err/Orth+Sg+Gen: **story telling/tarinointi**
* ★*mainstummu%^1VOWš{XC}^Pen^CC2C^V2VV%^K2GG* (is not standard language)
* ★*mainstummuužž0000* (is not standard language)

**Even syllabic verbs I, cg for b** - used
neiʹbb+N+Sg+Gen: **knife/veitsi**
* *nẹ^1VOWi0bb^V2VV^PAL^CC2C*
* *neeiʹb0000*
vuäʹbb+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2
* *vuä{ʹØ}bˈb^VOWRaise^PALẸ^Allegro^PAL^CCC2CAllegro>stad*
* *vuẹʹb0000000>stad*
äʹrbb+N+Sg+Gen: **heritage/perintö**
* *ä^1VOW0rbb^V2VV^PAL^YXX2YX*
* *ääʹrb0000*
joorbâs+A+Sg+Nom
* *jo^1VOWrbbâs^Pen^V2VV^Pen^YXX2YX*
* *joorb0âs0000*
kuâbsted
* *kuâ{ˈ1}bbast^Pen^CC2CAllegro^RmVow*
* *kuâˈb00st000*

**Even syllabic verbs I, second consonant loss p:0** - used in
* *ǩiâpp^CC2C*
* *ǩiâv00*
* *vuäʹppest^Pen^CC2CAllegro^RmVow>ed*
* *vuäʹp00st000>ed*
* *ka^1VOWmppâr^Pen^V2VV^Pen^YXX2YX*
* *kaamp0âr0000*
* ★*ka%^1VOWmppâr^Pen^V2VV^Pen^YXX2YX* (is not standard language)
* ★*kaamppâr0000* (is not standard language)
riipâs+N+Sg+Nom: **snail/etana**
* *rijppâs^Pen^YXX2VX*
* *riip0âs00*

**Even syllabic verbs I, cg v:0** - used with  +Imp+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+ConNeg, teevvad > teev
* *pẹ^1VOWi0vv^V2VV^PAL^CC2C*
* *peeiʹv0000*
aasvâs+N+Sg+Nom: ****
* *a^1VOWsvvâs^Pen^V2VV^Pen^YXX2YX*
* *aasv0âs0000*
tuõvâs+N+Sg+Nom: **candle/tuohus, kynttilä**
* *tuõvˈvâs^Pen^CCC2C*
* *tuõv00âs00*
juʹvjj+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3:
* *ju^1VOWv0jj^VV2V^PAL^YXX2VX>stes*
* *ju0uʹj0000>stes*
* *ju{ʹØ}v{ʹØ}jj^VV2V^PAL^YXX2VX>stes*
* *juʹ00j0000>stes*

**f:0** - used in

kaaʹff+N+Sg+Gen **coffee**
* *kaa0ff^PAL^CC2C*
* *kaaʹf000*

**Even syllabic verbs I, cg n:0** - used with  +Imp+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+ConNeg, jiõnn:jiõn
vueʹn+N+Sg+Nom: **mother-in-law/anoppi**
* *vuâ0nˈn^PALE^PAL^CCC2C*
* *vueʹn00000*
čuânj+N+Sg+Nom: **goose/hanhi**
* *čuõnˈnj^VOWLower^CCC2C*
* *čuân00j00*
jeäʹnn+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: **mother/äiti**
* *jeä0{ʹØ}nˈn^PALẸ^PAL^CCC2CAllegro>stan*
* *jiẹˈʹn00000>stan*
õõʹnni+N+Pl+Nom: **user/käyttäjä**
* *õõʹnn{ʹØ}i^CC2C*
* *õõʹn00i0*
huânas+N+Sg+Nom: ****
* *huânˈnas^Pen^CCC2C*
* *huân00as00*

**Even syllabic nouns I, with extra lengthening of vowel ij>ii/uv>uu and dd>d** - used with  +N+Sg+Nom > +N+Sg+Gen, sijdd > siid

* *ä^1VOWldd^V2VV^YXX2YX*
* *ääld000*
* *ä^1VOWldd^V2VV^VOWRaise^YXX2YX>už*
* *aald0000>už*
* *u^1VOWv0dd^PAL^YXX2VX*
* *u0uʹd000*
juʹrdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1 **think**
* *ju^1VOWrdd^V2VV^VOWLower^YXX2YX>am*
* *joord0000>am*

uʹvdded+V+Ind+Prs+4:
* *u^1VOWv0dd^PAL^YXX2VX>et*
* *u0uʹd000>et*

- idd:id, +Imp+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+ConNeg double consonants following vowel and "i" at coda that become single consonants in gradation
uudâs+N+Sg+Nom: **creature/luomus**
* *uvddâs^Pen^YXX2VX*
* *uud0âs00*

**Even syllabic verbs I, cg for ʒ** - used with  pääʹʒʒelm+N+Sg+Ill: päʹʒlma
sauʒʒ+N+Pl+Nom **sheep/lammas**
* *sa^1VOWuʒʒ^V2VV^YXX2YX*
* *saauʒ000*

**ǯ:0** - used in
kuʹvǯǯ+N+Sg+Gen
* *ku^1VOW{ʹØ}v{ʹØ}ǯǯ^PAL^YXX2VX*
* *ku00uʹǯ000*

**č:0** - used in

**c:0** - used in
* *kä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}cces^Pen^V2VV^Pen^PAL^Pen^YXX2VX*
* *kä00uʹc0es000000*

**ž:0** - used in

väžsted+V+Inf
* *vääžžast^Pen^VV2V^Pen^CC2CAllegro^RmVow^PALK>ed*
* *vä0ž00st000000>ed*

**z:0** - used in
* *ǩeâsttez^PenVow2a^RmCns*
* *ǩeâstta000*
juzrdâd+V+Inf:
* *juuzzârd^Pen^VV2V^Pen^CC2C^RmVow*
* *ju0z00rd00000*

**Even syllabic verbs I, cg for đ** - used with  ǩiđđ:ǩiiđ
* *ǩi^1VOWđđ^V2VV^CC2C*
* *ǩiiđ000*
* *o^1VOWđđâs^Pen^V2VV^Pen^CC2C*
* *oođ0âs0000*

**Even syllabic verbs I, cg for r** - used with  võrr:võõr
* *võ^1VOWrr^V2VV^CC2C*
* *võõr000*
* *paarr^CC2C*
* *paar00*
* *jä^1VOWu0rr^V2VV^PAL^CC2C*
* *jääuʹr0000*
čårsted+V+Inf: **descriminate/syrjiä**
* *čåårrast^Pen^VV2V^Pen^CC2C^RmVow>ed*
* *čå0r00st00000>ed*
* ★*čåårrast^Pen^VV2V^Pen^CC2C^RmVow>ed* (is not standard language)
* ★*čå0rr0st00000>ed* (is not standard language)

**Even syllabic verbs I, cg for l** - used with  vuʹvll+N+Sg+Gen: vuuʹl
deriving
* *to^1VOWll^V2VV^CC2C*
* *tool000*
* *stä^1VOW0llj^V2VV^PAL^CC2C*
* *stääʹl0j000*
alttõõlli+N+NomAg+Pl+Gen
* *alttõõll{ʼØ}i^CC2C*
* *alttõõl00i0*

pääʹljes+N+Sg+Nom: **path/polku**
* *pä^1VOW0lljes^Pen^V2VV^Pen^PAL^Pen^CC2C*
* *pääʹl0jes000000*
talsted+V+Inf:
* *taallâst^Pen^VV2V^Pen^CC2C^RmVow>ed*
* *ta0l00st00000>ed*

vuʹvll+N+Sg+Gen:
* *vu^1VOWv0ll^PAL^YXX2VX*
* *vu0uʹl000*

deriving kueʹll+N+Sg+Gen: kueʹl
* *kuâ0ll^V2VV^PALE^PAL^CC2C*
* *kueʹl00000*

**j:0 ** - used in

ǩeʹrjj+N+Pl+Nom: **book/kirja**
* *ǩẹ^1VOW0rjj^V2VV^PAL^YXX2YX*
* *ǩeeʹrj0000*
tuâjj+N+Sg+Acc: **work/työ**
* *tuâjj^CC2C*
* *tuâj00*
tuâjj+N+Sg+Gen:tuâi
* *tuâi000*
* *po^1VOWjjâs^Pen^V2VV^Pen^CC2C*
* *pooj0âs0000*

**Even syllabic verbs I, cg for g** - used in
cõõggâlm+N+Sg+Ill
* *cõõggâlm^Pen^VV2V^Pen^CC2C^RmVow>a*
* *cõ0g00lm00000>a*
* *ǩeâlggal^Pen^YXX2YX*
* *ǩeâlǥ0al00*

äiʹǧǧ+N+Sg+Gen: **time/aika**
* *ä^1VOWi0gg^V2VV^PAL^YXX2YX*
* *ääiʹj0000*
reäiʹǧǧ+N+Pl+Nom: **hole/reikä**
* *reäi0gg^PAL^YXX2YX*
* *reäiʹj000*

**Allegro loss ǧ** - used in
* *lååʹǧǧest^Pen^VV2V^Pen^CC2CAllegro^RmVow*
* *lå0ʹǧ00st00000*

GEMINATE TO WEAK QUALITY GEMINATE
**Even syllabic nouns I, with extra lengthening of vowel V>VV and KK>ǤǤ**  - used in
used with  +N+Sg+Nom > +N+Sg+Gen for cases like
lookki > looǥǥi.

čâustõk+N+Sg+Gen
* *čâustõ^1VOW{ʹØ}k{XC}^V2VV^K2GG*
* *čâustõõ0ǥǥ00*
with allegro
čâustõk+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg3
* *čâustõ{ʹØ}k^K2GAllegro>stes*
* *čâustõ0ǥ0>stes*

* *jo^1VOWkk^V2VV^KK2GG*
* *jooǥǥ00*
puâǥǥ+N+Sg+Nom: ****
* *puõkˈk^VOWLower^KKK2GG*
* *puâǥ0ǥ00*

čuâǥǥas+N+Sg+Nom  **road**
* *čuâkˈk^KKK2GG>as*
* *čuâǥ0ǥ0>as*

loǥškueʹtted **begin to read**
* *loo{ʹØ}kk^VV2V^KK2GAllegro»škueʹtted*
* *lo00ǥ000»škueʹtted*

čõõǥǥâs
* *čõ^1VOWkkâs^Pen^V2VV^Pen^KK2GG*
* *čõõǥǥâs0000*

**Even syllabic nouns I, with extra lengthening of vowel V>VV and k:j** - used in
used with
> .
tuʹmstõk+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom: **decision/päätös, mietintö**
* *tuʹmstõ^1VOW0k{XC}^V2VV^PAL^K2GG>e*
* *tuʹmstõõʹjj000>e*

with allegro

* *suä0kk^PALẸ^PAL^KK2GG*
* *suẹʹjj000*

* *jeä0kˈkel^Pen^PALE^Pen^PAL^Pen^KKK2GG^RmVow>až*
* *jeeʹj0j0l0000000>až*

**Even syllabic nouns I, with extra lengthening of vowel V>VV and ǩ:j** - used in
used with
> .

**š:0** - used in Allegro

šapšš+N+Sg+Gen **white fish/siika**
* *ša^1VOWpšš^V2VV^YXX2YX*
* *šaapš000*
ruõšsted+V+Inf: ****
* *ruõ{ˈ1%}ššâst^Pen^CC2CAllegro^RmVow>ed*
* *ruõˈš00st000>ed*

**Even syllabic verbs I, Voicing š:ž** - ss:zz, +Imp+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+ConNeg, double consonants at coda become voiced in gradation
lookkmõš+N+Sg+Gen
* *lookkmõ^1VOWš{XC}^V2VV^K2GG*
* *lookkmõõžž00*
with allegro

* *pååss^VV2V^KK2GAllegro»škuätt*
* *på0z000»škuätt*

mainstummuš+N+Sg+Gen:
* *mainstummuš^VC*
* *mainstummuž0*

**Even syllabic verbs I, Voicing c:ʒ** - cc:zz, +Imp+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+ConNeg, double consonants at coda become voiced in gradation
* *čää0cc^PAL^KK2GG*
* *čääʹʒʒ00*
čääʹcc+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3
* *čää0cc^VV2V^PAL^KK2GAllegro>stes*
* *čä0ʹʒ0000>stes*
* *čää0cc^PAL^KK2GG>stes*
* *čääʹʒʒ00>stes*
* *puõcˈc^VOWLower^PALÄ^KKK2GG*
* *puäʒ0ʒ000*
* *pååss^VV2V^KK2GAllegro»škuätt*
* *på0z000»škuätt*

õõʒʒâs+N+Sg+Nom: **high water/vuoksi**
* *õ^1VOWccâs^Pen^V2VV^Pen^KK2GG*
* *õõʒʒâs0000*

**Even syllabic verbs I, Voicing č:j** - ss:zz, +Imp+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+ConNeg, double consonants at coda become voiced in gradation

* *pååss^VV2V^KK2GAllegro»škuätt*
* *på0z000»škuätt*

**Even syllabic verbs I, Voicing after long vowel or diphthong s:z s:z** - ss:zz, +Imp+Sg2, +Ind+Prs+ConNeg, double consonants at coda become voiced in gradation
tääʹss+N+Sg+Gen: **level/taso**
* *tää0ss^PAL^KK2GG*
* *tääʹzz00*
* *mättʼtõ^1VOWs{XC}^V2VV^K2GG*
* *mättʼtõõzz00*
with allegro

cieʹǩǩes+N+Sg+Gen: **trick, type of ear mark/tikki, pykälä**
* ★*ciâkˈkes^Pen^VOWLower%^PenVow2a%^VC* (is not standard language)
* ★*ceäkˈkas0000* (is not standard language)
* *pååss^VV2V^KK2GAllegro»škuätt*
* *på0z000»škuätt*

čårrõs+N+Sg+Gen
* *čårrõ^1VOW{ʹØ}s{XC}^V2VV^K2GG*
* *čårrõõ0zz00*

**Even syllabic verbs I, second consonant loss t:0** - used in
autt+N+Pl+Nom **car/auto**
* *a^1VOWutt^V2VV^CC2C*
* *aaut000*
põrtt+N+Pl+Nom **house/talo**
* *põ^1VOW{ʹØ}rtt^V2VV^YXX2YX*
* *põõ0rt000*

* *ko^1VOWnttâr^Pen^V2VV^Pen^YXX2YX*
* *koont0âr0000*
puʹtsted+V+Inf: ****
* *puuʹttest^Pen^VV2V^Pen^CC2CAllegro^RmVow*
* *pu0ʹt00st00000*
piiutâs+N+Sg+Nom **clothing/vaate**
* *pi^1VOWhttâs^Pen^V2VV^Pen^YXX2VX*
* *piiut0âs0000*
kääđas+N+Sg+Nom
* *kä^1VOWttas^Pen^V2VV^Pen^CC2C*
* *kääđ0as0000*

**Consonant loss s:0** - used in

* *sä^1VOWhss^V2VV^YXX2VX>am*
* *sääus000>am*

ǩeeʹstes+N+Pl+Nom:  **glove/kinnas**
* *ǩeâ%{ʹØ%}sttes^PenVow2a^RmCns*
* *ǩeâ0stta000*

uhss+N+Sg+Gen **door**
* *uhss^YXX2VX*
* *uus00*

ǩeäsʼsted+V+Inf:
* *ǩeä{ˈ1}ssa0st^Pen^CC2CAllegro^RmVow^PALK>ed*
* *ǩeäˈs00ʼst0000>ed*
âʹpsted+V+Inf: **smell a little/haiskahtaa**
* *ââʹpsest^Pen^VV2V^RmVow*
* *â0ʹp00st000*

**Consonant loss ŋ:0** - used in

**Consonant loss h:0** - used in
ruʹhss+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3:
* *ru^1VOW0hss^VV2V^PAL^YXX2VX>stes*
* *ru0ʹ0s0000>stes*
påʹhlded+V+Inf: ****
* *pååʹhheld^Pen^VV2V^Pen^CC2CAllegro^RmVow*
* *på0ʹh00ld00000*

**Even syllabic verbs I, t>đ** - tt:đ
ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1 **hand,arm/käsi**
* *ǩiõ0tt^Allegro^PAL^CC2CAllegro>stan*
* *ǩiõʹđ0000>stan*
autt+N+Pl+Nom **car/auto**
* ★*a^1VOWutt^V2VV^CC2C* (is not standard language)
* ★*aauđ000* (is not standard language)
puuttâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: **end/loppua**
* *puutt^CC2C>i*
* *puuđ00>i*
kääđas+N+Sg+Nom:
* *kä%^1VOWttas^Pen^V2VV^Pen^CC2C*
* *kääđ0as0000*
* *čuâ{ʹØ}ttes^Pen^PALE^Pen^PAL^Pen^CC2C*
* *čueʹđ0es000000*

**Even syllabic nouns I, p>v** - pp:v
* *ǩiâpp^CC2C*
* *ǩiâv00*
* *heäpˈpaš^Pen^CCC2C*
* *heäv00aš00*

**Consonant quality change ǥ:j** - used in
* *lääi0ǥ^PAL*
* *lääiʹj0*
čiõʹlj+N+Sg+Nom: **back/selkä**
* *čeâ{ʹØ}lǥ^VOWRaise^PAL*
* *čiõʹlj00*

* *jäämalǥ^Pen^VV2V^RmVow^PALK>ed*
* *jä0m0lj0000>ed*

**Even syllabic verbs I, second consonant loss k:0** - used in
loǥškueʹtted **begin to read**
* *lookk^VV2V^KK2GAllegro»škueʹtted*
* *lo0ǥ000»škueʹtted*
mieʹlǩǩ+N+Sg+Acc: **milk/maito**
* *meâ0lkk^VOWRaise^PALE^PAL^CC2C*
* *mieʹlǩ00000*
* *pååss^VV2V^KK2GAllegro»škuätt*
* *på0z000»škuätt*
taalkâs+N+Sg+Nom
* *ta^1VOWlkkâs^Pen^V2VV^Pen^YXX2YX*
* *taalk0âs0000*

* *jeä{ʹØ}kˈkel^Pen^PALE^Pen^PAL^Pen^KKK2ZERO*
* *jeeʹ000el000000*
nââʹer+N+Sg+Nom sleep
* *nââʹ00er000000*

**Even syllabic verbs I, second consonant loss ǩ:0** - used in

eʹǩrded+V+Inf
* *eeʹǩǩerd^Pen^VV2V^Pen^CC2C^RmVow>ed*
* *e0ʹǩ00rd00000>ed*

**Even syllabic verbs I, second consonant loss ǥ:0** - used in

påǥsted+V+Inf
* *pååǥǥast^Pen^VV2V^Pen^CC2C^RmVow>ed*
* *på0ǥ00st00000>ed*

**Even syllabic verbs I, lgg>lǥ**
vueʹlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2
* *vuâ{ʹØ}lgg^YXX2YX>ak*
* *vuâ0lǥ00>ak*

* ★*vuâ{ʹØ}lgg^YXX2YX>ak* (is not standard language)
* ★*vuâ0lg00>ak* (is not standard language)
õlggâd+V+Cond+Sg3
* *õ^1VOW{ʹØ}lgg^V2VV^YXX2YX>či*
* *õõ0lǥ000>či*
* ★*õ^1VOW{ʹØ}lgg^V2VV^YXX2YX>či* (is not standard language)
* ★*õõ0lg000>či* (is not standard language)

* *ǩeâlggal^Pen^YXX2YX*
* *ǩeâlǥ0al00*
* *aaggâst^Pen^VV2V^Pen^CC2C^RmVow>ed*
* *a0g00st00000>ed*

**even syllabic verbs I, 'lgg>'lj** - used in
vueʹlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1
* *vuâ0lgg^VOWRaise^PAL^YXX2YX>im*
* *vuõʹlj0000>im*
* *ä^1VOWi0gg^V2VV^PAL^YXX2YX*
* *ääiʹj0000*
reäiʹǧǧ+N+Pl+Nom
* *reäi0gg^PAL^YXX2YX*
* *reäiʹj000*

## Rules for cleaning up and composing end result

* Strengthening Consonant Cluster
* V shortening and C lengthening
* %^C2CC is generally used in conjunction with a preceding %^VV2V
* In verbs this will be observed in finite forms
* In derivational morphology, e.g. -škuetted, this is not the case

**Orthographic Consonant lengthening Weak to strong %{XC%}:Cx ** - used in
* *čââʹlmtẹ^1VOWm{XC}^C2CC>a*
* *čââʹlmtẹ0mm0>a*
kaađneǩ+N+Sg+Gen 
* *kaađnẹ^1VOW{ʹØ}ǩ{XC}^PALNo^C2CC>a*
* *kaađnẹ00kk00>a*

**Orthographic Consonant lengthening Weak to strong %{XC%}:Cx for n and l** - used in

* *ma^1VOWnn^V2VV^VOWLower^CC2C*
* *mään0000*
